Arkansas, session 2025, SB643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas residents continue to face economic hardships due
to spiraling inflation;
(2) Costs continue to rise for public utility ratepayers for
both electricity and natural gas, stretching family budgets to pay for
critical services in this state;
(3) Electric rates have increased four (4) times for many
Arkansas ratepayers since 2021;
(4) Natural gas rates increased by more than twenty-three
percent (23%) for Summit Utilities ratepayers in 2024;
(5) Public utilities must be good stewards of public utility
ratepayer funds and should be transparent with how public utility ratepayer
funds are spent; and
*ANS171*
04/14/2025 9:36:18 AM ANS171

SB643
(6) A utility owned by a governmental entity is mandated to
operate with transparency under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-
19-101 et seq.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that Arkansas takes
responsibility to ensure public utility rates are established with full
transparency and accountability.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 3, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 8 — Transparency and Accountability of Public Utilities

23-3-801. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Advertising" means the act of publishing, disseminating,
soliciting, or circulating written, online, video, or audio communication
intended to induce a person to patronize a product, service, business, or
industry or to promote a business’s brand.
(B) "Advertising" includes without limitation the act of:
(i) Otherwise emphasizing desirable qualities about
a product, service, business, or industry; or
(ii) Influencing public opinion with respect to
legislative, administrative, or electoral matters.
(C) "Advertising" does not include public communication:
(i) Required by law, rule, or order;
(ii) The primary purpose of which is to communicate:
(a) Service interruptions, safety measures, or
emergency conditions; or
(b) Employment opportunities with a public
utility; or
(iii) Directly related to a program approved by the
Arkansas Public Service Commission regarding income-based service, special
rates, or energy conservation.
(D) "Advertising" includes a communication if any portion
of the communication is “advertising” as defined in this section;
(2) "Compensation" means salary, bonus, benefits, or other
04/14/2025 9:36:18 AM ANS171

SB643
consideration of any value;
(3) "Covered business unit" means a division, department, or
other organizational employee group within a public utility that performs
activities described under this subchapter;
(4) "Electric utility" means a public utility, an investor-owned
utility, an electric cooperative, or any private power supplier or marketer
that is engaged in the business of supplying electrical energy to the
ultimate consumer or any customer classes within this state;
(5) "Expense" means any payment, expenditure, compensation, or
costs;
(6) "Gas utility" means a person, or any combination of persons,
including a lessee, trustee, or receiver of a utility that:
(A) Owns or operates, for compensation in this state,
equipment or facilities for storing, transmitting, distributing, selling, or
furnishing natural gas to or for the public at retail; and
(B) Is regulated by the commission;
(7) "Governmental utility" means a utility that is required to
make its records available for inspection and copy under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.;
(8)(A) "Political influence activity" means an expense for the
purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the possible:
(i) Adoption, repeal, or modification of federal,
state, or local rules, regulations, legislation, or ordinances;
(ii) Election, recall, appointment, or removal of a
public official;
(iii) Adoption or rejection of initiatives or
referenda;
(iv) Approval, modification, or revocation of a
public utility franchise;
(v) Public opinion with respect to federal, state,
or local:
(a) Adoption, repeal, or modification of
rules, regulations, legislation, or ordinances;
(b) Election, recall, appointment, or removal
of a public official;
(c) Adoption or rejection of initiatives or
04/14/2025 9:36:18 AM ANS171

SB643
referenda;
(d) Approval, modification, or revocation of a
public utility franchise; or
(e) Public utility rate setting; or
(vi) Decisions of federal, state, or local
government officials.
(B) "Political influence activity" includes an activity
undertaken in support of activities listed in subdivisions (8)(A)(i) — (vi)
of this section, including research, analysis, preparation, or planning or
any other related costs identified by the commission.
(C) "Political influence activity" does not include:
(i) An appearance before the commission when the
public utility is the applicant in an uncontested proceeding; or
(ii) An appearance before a legislative committee,
the commission, or a state agency when the public utility’s participation has
been specifically requested in writing by the chair of the legislative
committee, chair of the commission, or head of the state agency;
(9)(A) "Public utility" means:
(i) An electric utility; or
(ii) A gas utility.
(B) "Public utility" does not include a governmental
utility; and
(10) "Public utility affiliate" means an entity that is related
to the public utility as a subsidiary, parent, or sibling corporation,
including without limitation by shareholding or other means of control.

23-3-802. Public utility rate transparency and disclosure — Political
and investor-related expenses.
(a)(1) On or before January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, each
public utility with more than three thousand (3,000) ratepayers shall provide
a report to the Legislative Council.
(2) The report required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall include the expenses from the previous calendar year of any direct or
indirect costs that are recovered through rates of a public utility for:
(A) Membership, dues, sponsorships, or contributions to a
trade association if any portion of those contributions supports political
04/14/2025 9:36:18 AM ANS171

SB643
influence activities or advertising;
(B) Charitable giving, including contributions to
organizations qualified under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(4),
as they existed on January 1, 2025, and any expenses related to charitable
giving;
(C) Political influence activities;
(D) Advertising;
(E) Any compensation for an employee of a public utility,
if any portion of that compensation is used for attempts by the employee to
influence the decision of federal, state, or local government officials;
(F) Contributions to a political candidate, political
party, campaign committee, issue committee, or independent expenditure
committee or other political expenses;
(G) Litigation regarding existing or proposed federal,
state, or local rules, regulations, legislation, or ordinances;
(H) Any costs, including marketing, administration,
customer service, or other costs, for products or services not regulated by
the Arkansas Public Service Commission;
(I) Penalties or fines, including tax penalties or fines,
issued against a public utility;
(J) Travel, lodging, or food and beverage expenses for a
public utility’s board of directors and officers or the board of directors
and officers of a public utility affiliate;
(K) Any owned, leased, or chartered aircraft for the
public utility’s board of directors and officers or the board of directors
and officers of a public utility affiliate;
(L) Investor relations; and
(M) Annual compensation that is in excess of the current
annual compensation of the Governor for an individual, including an employee
of the public utility, a member of the public utility’s board of directors or
officers, or a member of the board of directors or officers of a public
utility affiliate.
(b) The report required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall
include without limitation:
(1) An itemized list of all expenses associated with activities
described under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, including any expenses
04/14/2025 9:36:18 AM ANS171

SB643
paid to:
(A) A vendor, including a separate line item for each
payment to a vendor for activities described under subdivision (a)(2) of this
section;
(B) A trade association, if any portion of those expenses
supports political influence activities or advertising;
(C) An organization qualified under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)
or 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(4), as they existed on January 1, 2025;
(D)(i) A public utility employee in the form of
compensation or reimbursement.
(ii) For each employee listed under subdivision
(b)(1)(D)(i) of this section, the list shall include:
(a) The employee’s job title;
(b) A job description sufficient to describe
the employee’s responsibilities;
(c) Each activity described under subdivision
(a)(2) of this section in which the employee engaged;
(d) A description sufficient to describe the
employee's nature of that work;
(e) The total annual compensation for the
employee;
(f) The percentage of annual compensation paid
for work associated with the activities described under subdivision (a)(2) of
this section;
(g) The percentage of annual compensation
recoverable from ratepayers; and
(h) All uniform system of account codes to
which compensation was recorded for the employee; and
(E) Public utility affiliates, including a separate line
item for each payment to a public utility affiliate for activities described
under subdivision (a)(2) of this section;
(2) A list of all expenses paid to vendors; and
(3)(A) A list of covered business units of the public utility.
(B) For each covered business unit, the public utility
shall include a list of employees who work in that covered business unit.
(C) For each employee, the public utility shall include:
04/14/2025 9:36:18 AM ANS171

SB643
(i) The employee’s job title;
(ii) A job description sufficient to describe the
employee’s responsibilities; and
(iii) Whether or not the employee conducted an
activity that is described under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(c)(1) For an employee who conducted an activity described under
subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the report required under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section shall list:
(A) Each activity described in subdivision (a)(2) of this
section in which the employee engaged;
(B) A description sufficient to describe the nature of
that work;
(C) The total annual compensation paid for work associated
with the activities described under subdivision (a)(2) of this section;
(D) The percentage of annual compensation recoverable from
ratepayers; and
(E) All uniform system of account codes to which
compensation was recorded for the employee.
(2) An itemized list required under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall include:
(A) The billing amount;
(B) The billing date;
(C) The identity of the payee;
(D) An explanation of the expense sufficient to describe
its purpose; and
(E) Any other itemized information deemed relevant by the
Legislative Council.









04/14/2025 9:36:18 AM ANS171